Wisconsin, session 2025, AB508.
do enact as follows:AB508,14Section 1. 108.04 (2) (h) of the statutes is repealed.AB508,25Section 2. 108.04 (12) (f) of the statutes is repealed.AB508,31Section 3. Initial applicability.AB508,2,32(1) This act first applies to weeks of unemployment beginning on the first 3Sunday after publication.AB508,2,44